Rhode Island, session 2025, SB385.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Short Title.
This act may be cited as the "2025 Utility Company Billing Transparency Act."
SECTION 2. Findings.
The general assembly finds as follows:
1. Consumers have expressed concerns that utility company bills, such as those from Rhode
Island Energy (RIE), contain a variety of charges that are confusing and burdensome, particularly
regarding how costs are calculated and how funds are used;
2. Clear and concise explanations of the charges on utility company bills would enable
consumers to better understand their utility costs and make informed decisions regarding their
service;
3. Transparency regarding the costs included in utility company bills would promote trust
and accountability among all stakeholders and the general public; and
4. Similar measures to ensure billing transparency and understanding of utility company
charges have been successfully implemented in other states
SECTION 3. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act:
(1) “Utility company bill” or “utility bill” means the utility bill issued by the electric
distribution company as defined by § 39-1-2(a)(12) and gas distribution company included as a

public utility in § 39-1-2(a)(20) having greater than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers that
includes charges for residential energy services, which may include, but are not limited to, base
utility charges, fees, taxes, and any other charges related to the provision of energy services.
SECTION 4. Section 39-1-27.7.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-1 entitled "Public
Utilities Commission" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1-27.7.1. Revenue decoupling.
(a) The general assembly finds and declares that electricity and gas revenues shall be fully
decoupled from sales pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and further finds and declares that
any decoupling proposal submitted by an electric distribution company as defined in § 39-1-
2(a)(12) or gas distribution company included as a public utility in § 39-1-2(a)(20) that has greater
than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers, shall be for the following purposes:
(1) Increasing efficiency in the operations and management of the electric and gas
distribution system;
(2) Achieving the goals established in the electric distribution company’s plan for system
reliability and energy efficiency and conservation procurement as required pursuant to § 39-1-
27.7(d);
(3) Increasing investment in least-cost resources that will reduce long-term electricity
demand;
(4) Reducing risks for both customers and the distribution company including, but not
limited to, societal risks, weather risks, and economic risks;
(5) Increasing investment in end-use energy efficiency;
(6) Eliminating disincentives to support energy-efficiency programs;
(7) Facilitating and encouraging investment in utility infrastructure, safety, and reliability;
and
(8) Considering the reduction of fixed, recurring customer charges and transition to
increased unit charges that more accurately reflect the long-term costs of energy production and
delivery.
(b) Each electric distribution company as defined by § 39-1-2(a)(12) and gas distribution
company included as a public utility in § 39-1-2(a)(20) having greater than one hundred thousand
(100,000) customers shall file proposals at the commission to implement the policy set forth in
subsection (a) of this section. The commission shall approve these proposals, provided they contain
the features and components set forth in subsection (c) of this section, and that they are consistent
with the intent and objectives contained in subsection (a) of this section. Actions taken by the
commission in the exercise of its ratemaking authority for electric and gas rate cases shall be within
LC001809 - Page 2 of 6

the norm of industry standards and recognize the need to maintain the financial health of the
distribution company as a stand-alone entity in Rhode Island.
(c) The proposals shall contain the following features and components:
(1) A revenue decoupling reconciliation mechanism that reconciles annually the revenue
requirement allowed in the company’s base distribution-rate case to revenues actually received for
the applicable twelve-month (12) period. Any revenues over-recovered or under-recovered shall be
credited to, or recovered from, customers, as applicable; and
(2) An annual infrastructure, safety, and reliability spending plan for each fiscal year and
an annual rate-reconciliation mechanism that includes a reconcilable allowance for the anticipated
capital investments and other spending pursuant to the annual pre-approved budget as developed
in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Prior to the beginning of each fiscal year, gas and electric distribution companies shall
consult with the division of public utilities and carriers regarding their infrastructure, safety, and
reliability spending plan for the following fiscal year, addressing the following categories:
(1) Capital spending on utility infrastructure;
(2) For electric distribution companies, operation and maintenance expenses on vegetation
management;
(3) For electric distribution companies, operation and maintenance expenses on system
inspection, including expenses from expected resulting repairs; and
(4) Any other costs relating to maintaining safety and reliability that are mutually agreed
upon by the division and the company.
The distribution company shall submit a plan to the division and the division shall
cooperate in good faith to reach an agreement on a proposed plan for these categories of costs for
the prospective fiscal year within sixty (60) days. To the extent that the company and the division
mutually agree on a plan, such plan shall be filed with the commission for review and approval
within ninety (90) days. If the company and the division cannot agree on a plan, the company shall
file a proposed plan with the commission and the commission shall review and, if the investments
and spending are found to be reasonably needed to maintain safe and reliable distribution service
over the short and long term, approve the plan within ninety (90) days.
(e) The commission shall have the following duties and powers, in addition to its existing
authorities established in this title:
(1) To maintain reasonable and adequate service-quality standards, after decoupling, that
are in effect at the time of the proposal and were established pursuant to § 39-3-7.
(2) The commission may exclude the low-income rate class from the revenue decoupling
LC001809 - Page 3 of 6

reconciliation-rate mechanism for either electric or gas distribution. The commission also may
exclude customers in the large commercial and industrial rate class from the gas-distribution
mechanism.
(3) The commission may adopt performance incentives for the electric distribution
company that provide a shared-savings mechanism whereby the company would receive a
percentage of savings realized as a result of achieving the purposes of this section while the
remaining savings are credited to customers.
(4) The commission shall review and approve, with any necessary amendments,
performance-based, energy-savings targets developed and submitted by the Rhode Island energy
efficiency and resources management council. The performance-based targets shall also be used as
a consideration in any shared-savings mechanism established by the commission pursuant to
subsection (e)(3) of this section.
(f) The Rhode Island energy efficiency and resources management council shall propose
performance-based, energy-savings targets to the commission no later than September 1, 2010. The
targets shall include, but not be limited to, specific energy kilowatt-hour savings overall and peak-
demand savings for both summer and winter peak periods expressed in total megawatts as well as
appropriate targets recommended in the opportunities report filed with the commission pursuant to
§ 39-1-27.7(d)(3). The council shall revise, as necessary, these targets on an annual basis prior to
the reconciliation process established pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and submit its
revisions to the commission for approval.
(g) Reporting. Every electric distribution company, as defined in subsection (a) of this
section, shall report to the governor, general assembly, division of public utilities and carriers, and
public utilities commission on or before September 1, 2012. The report shall include, but not be
limited to, the following elements:
(1) A comparison of revenues from traditional rate regulation and how the revenues have
differed as part of an approved decoupling structure;
(2) A summary of how the company is achieving the performance-based targets that may
have been adopted pursuant to subsection (e)(4) of this section;
(3) A summary of any shared savings the company may have received pursuant to the
performance incentives authorized in subsection (e)(3) of this section;
(4) A summary of how the company is achieving the service-quality standards required in
subsection (e)(1) of this section;
(5) An overview of how decoupling is impacting revenue stabilization goals that have
resulted from decoupling; and
LC001809 - Page 4 of 6

(6) A summary of any customer education programs provided.
SECTION 5. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-45. Requirements prior to implementing rate changes.
(a) Each electric distribution company as defined by § 39-1-2(a)(12) and gas distribution
company included as a public utility in § 39-1-2(a)(20) having greater than one hundred thousand
(100,000) customers shall comply with the following:
(1) Before implementing rate changes, utilities shall submit a ratepayer impact analyses
(RIA) that estimates the impact of proposed rate changes on different customer classes. This RIA
shall include analysis of the cost-benefit relationship of rate adjustments, particularly how they
benefit or disadvantage various sectors;
(2) Provide monthly detailed descriptions of charges in utility company bills, including
how much of the charge goes toward various services in order that customers can understand the
effects of rate adjustments;
(3) Provide periodic explanations of significant rate changes or cost fluctuations, such as
variations in energy procurement costs, regulatory adjustments, changes in charges for supply,
transmission, distribution and other costs, and how those factors may change over time; as well as
an explanation that shall include information of how customers can reduce their bill; and
(4) Provide annual reports that include a breakdown of the costs contributing to rate
adjustments, such as energy procurement costs, infrastructure investments, revenues and profits,
and operational costs.
(b) Enforcement.
(1) The public utilities commission shall oversee compliance with this section and may
impose fines or penalties for failure to provide accurate, timely, and clear explanations of rate
changes.
(2) Failure to include with a rate filing a clear explanation as required under this section
shall result in suspension of the rate filing until proper notifications and explanations are provided.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001809
========
LC001809 - Page 5 of 6